Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-702
Partisan primary election; candidate;
affiliation required; when; rule or revocation of rule; when effective.

Any political party may, by the adoption of a rule, require that any
individual whose name is placed on such party's partisan primary election
ballot be a registered voter affiliated with such party. If the political party adopts or revokes the rule and notifies
the Secretary of State by filing the rule or notice of the revocation with
the Secretary of State prior to December 1 of the calendar year before a statewide
primary election, the rule or revocation is effective for the next and subsequent
statewide primary elections. If a rule or notice of revocation is filed with
the Secretary of State on or after December 1 of the calendar year before
a statewide primary election and on or before the day of the statewide primary
election, the rule or revocation is effective for the subsequent statewide
primary elections.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 202;

Laws 2014, LB1048, § 6.